Utah, session 2026, HB83.
Section 1. Section 53-5a-109 is enacted to read:53-5a-109. Possession of an altered toy, look-alike, or imitation firearm by a minor.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Altered toy, look-alike, or imitation firearm" means a toy, look-alike, or imitation firearm that has been altered so that a reasonable person would believe that the toy, look-alike, or imitation firearm is an actual firearm.(b)"Minor" means an individual younger than 18 years old.(c)"Public place" means the same as that term is defined in Section 76-9-102.(d)"Toy, look-alike, or imitation firearm" means a non-firearm device regulated under 16 C.F.R. Part 1272.(2)It is an infraction for a minor to possess an altered toy, look-alike, or imitation firearm if the minor:(a)intentionally or knowingly possesses the altered toy, look-alike, or imitation firearm in a public place;(b)knows the possessed toy, look-alike, or imitation firearm is an altered toy, look-alike, or imitation firearm; and(c)has previously received a documented warning from a law enforcement officer warning the minor that it is unlawful for the minor to possess an altered toy, look-alike, or imitation firearm in a public place.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.